src/morphology/stems/altstem-adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_MARTO
!! The quantitative gradation of t in basic changes stems for locative cases:
!! siirto
!! siirrossa
!! siirtoihin
!! siirroista
0:to    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:to    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ro       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:to    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ro       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:to    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:to    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:to    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ro   A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ro   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE   ;


!LEXICON A_XXRTU
!! Similarly for u stems with quantitative t gradation:
!tu   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!tu   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!tu:ru    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!tu   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!tu:ru    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!tu   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
!tu   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
!tu   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!tu   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!tu   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


!LEXICON A_XXRTY
!! As with y and t:
!! vety
!! vedyssä
!! vetyihin
!! vedyistä
!ty   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ty   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ty:ry    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ty   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
!ty:ry    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
!ty   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
!ty   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
!ty   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!ty   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!ty   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

!LEXICON A_XXRTÖ
!! And ö with t:
!tö   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!tö   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!tö:rö    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!tö   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
!tö:rö    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
!tö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
!tö   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
!tö   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!tö   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!tö   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

!LEXICON A_XUKU
!! Few words ending in uku will have v as weak variant of k:
!! luku
!! luvussa
!! luvuista
!! lukuihin
!ku   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ku   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ku:vu    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ku   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!ku:vu    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!ku   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
!ku   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
!ku   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!ku   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!ku   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


!LEXICON A_XYKY
!! As with yky:
!! kyky
!! kyvyssä
!! kyvyistä
!! kykyihin
!ky   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ky   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ky:vy    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!ky   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
!ky:vy    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
!ky   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
!ky   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
!ky   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!ky   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!ky   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


LEXICON A_HUPAKKO
!! The trisyllabic words ending with gradating long k have plural illative
!! in both strong and weak forms:
!! € hupakko, hupakko, silly girl
!! € hupakoihin, hupakoihin, silly girl
!! € hupakkoihin, hupakkoihin, silly girl
0:o    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:o    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_
!! The trisyllabic words ending with gradating long k have plural illative
!! in both strong and weak forms:
!! € ryteikkö, ryteikkö, shrubbery
!! € ryteiköihin, ryteiköihin, shrubbery
!! € ryteikköihin, ryteikköihin, shrubbery
!0:ö    A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!0:ö    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
!0:ö   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!!
!! Adjective stems with i:e variations
!! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
LEXICON A_ABNORMI
!! The i stems have i : e : 0 variation:
!! ruuvi
!! ruuveina
!! ruuvien
0:i     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     A_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_STYDI
!! Similarly for front vowels:
!! alkyyli
!! alkyyleinä
!! alkyylien
0:i     A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     A_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_OPAAKKI
!! The i stems combined with (quantitative) gradation of k will form five
!! separate stem variants:
!! lokki
!! lokissa
!! lokkeina
!! lokeista
!! lokkien
0:i     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:k     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ke   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_PINKKI
!! Similarly for front vowel version:
!! häkki
!! häkissä
!! häkkeinä
!! häkeistä
!! häkkien
0:i     A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ke    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:ke     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:k     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ke   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_XXXPI
!!! kuppi
!!! kupissa
!!! kuppeina
!!! kupeista
!!! kuppien
!pi       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:i     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:e     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!pi       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!pi:i  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
!pi:pe   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SIPPI
!! tyyppi
!! tyypissä
!! tyyppeinä
!! tyypeistä
!! tyyppien
0:i     A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pe    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:pe    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:p     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pe    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:pe   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HURTTI
!! kortti
!! kortissa
!! kortteina
!! korteista
!! korttien
0:i     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:te   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VÄÄRTTI
!!! skeitti
!!! skeitissä
!!! skeitteinä
!!! skeiteistä
!!! skeittien
0       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:i       A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te     A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:e     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te     A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:t     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te     A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:te   A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_XXXPI
!!! hupi
!!! huvissa
!!! hupeina
!!! huveista
!!! hupien
!pi       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!pi       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:vi     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!pi:ve     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!pi       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
!pi       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!pi:p     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!pi:pe    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!pi:vi  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
!pi:pe   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!!LEXICON A_XXXPI
!! No examples
!!pi       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!!pi       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!!pi:vi     A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
!!pi:pe    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
!!pi:ve     A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
!!pi       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
!!pi       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;
!!pi:pe    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
!!pi:p     A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!!pi:pe    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


LEXICON A_TUHTI
!! tauti
!! taudissa
!! tauteina
!! taudeista
!! tautien
0:i     A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:di     A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:te    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:de     A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i     A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:te    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:t     A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:te    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:di  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:te   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
